Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Land Quality
§ 35-11-406.
Application for permit; generally; denial; limitations.

Applications for a mining permit shall be made in writing to the administrator and shall contain:

The name and address of the applicant, and, if the applicant is a partnership, association, or corporation, the names and addresses of all managers, partners and executives directly responsible for operations in this state;

A sworn statement stating that the applicant has the right and power by legal estate owned to mine from the land for which the permit is desired;

A sworn statement that the applicant has not forfeited a bond posted for reclamation purposes and that all the statements contained in the permit application are true and correct to the best knowledge of the applicant;

The names and last known addresses of the owners of record of the surface and mineral rights on the land to be covered by the proposed permit;

The names and last known addresses of the owners of record of the surface rights of the lands immediately adjacent to the proposed permit area and for surface coal mining operations, the names and last known addresses of coal ownership immediately adjacent to the permit area;

An identification of the land to be included in the permit area to include:

The location of the lands by legal subdivision, section, township, range, county, and municipal corporation, if any;

The name, if any, by which such lands or any part thereof are known;

The approximate number of acres to be affected, including the total number of acres in the area covered by the permit application;

The nearest town, village, or city.

A general description of the land which shall include as nearly as possible its vegetative cover, the annual rainfall, the general directions and average velocities of the winds, indigenous wildlife, its past and present uses, its present surface waters, and adjudicated water rights and their immediate drainage areas and uses, and, if known, the nature and depth of the overburden, topsoil, subsoil, mineral seams or other deposits and any subsurface waters known to exist above the deepest projected depth of the mining operation;

A United States Geological Survey topographic map, if available, of the permit area;

A map based upon public records showing the boundaries of the land to be affected, its surrounding immediate drainage area, the location and names, where known, of all roads, railroads, public or private rights-of-way and easements, utility lines, lakes, streams, creeks, springs, and other surface water courses, oil wells, gas wells, water wells, and the probable limits of underground mines and surface mines, whether active or inactive, on or immediately adjacent to the land to be affected. The map shall also show:

The names, last known addresses and boundary lines of the present surface landowners and occupants on the adjacent land to be affected;

The location, ownership, and uses of all buildings on, or on lands adjacent to, the land to be affected;

An outline of all areas previously disturbed by underground mining or that will be affected by future underground mining as a guide to potential subsidence problems;

Any political boundaries of special districts on or near the land to be affected.

The mineral or minerals to be mined;

The estimated dates of commencement and termination of the proposed permit;

A minimum fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00) plus ten dollars ($10.00) for each acre in the requested permit, but the maximum fee for any single permit shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00). The permit is amendable, excepting permits for surface coal mining operations, without public notice or hearing if the area sought to be included by amendment does not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total permit acreage, is contiguous to the permit area, and if the operator includes all of the information necessary in his application to amend that is required in this section including a mining and reclamation plan acceptable to the administrator. The fee for a permit amendment shall be two hundred dollars ($200.00) plus ten dollars ($10.00) for each acre not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00);

A certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in the United States certifying that the applicant has a public liability insurance policy in force for the surface mining and reclamation operations for which this permit is sought, or evidence that the applicant has satisfied other state or federal self-insurance requirements. This policy shall provide for personal injury and property damage protection in an amount adequate to compensate any persons damaged as a result of surface coal mining and reclamation operations including use of explosives and entitled to compensation under the applicable provisions of state law. This policy shall be maintained in full force and effect during the terms of the permit or any renewal, including the length of all reclamation operations;

For surface coal mining permit applications, a schedule listing all notices of violation which resulted in enforcement action of this act, and any law, rule or regulation of the United States, or of any department or agency in the United States pertaining to air or water environmental protection incurred by the applicant in connection with any surface coal mining operation during the three (3) year period prior to the date of application;

Such other information as the administrator deems necessary or as good faith compliance with the provisions of this act require.

The application shall include a mining plan and reclamation plan dealing with the extent to which the mining operation will disturb or change the lands to be affected, the proposed future use or uses and the plan whereby the operator will reclaim the affected lands to the proposed future use or uses. The mining plan and reclamation plan shall be consistent with the objectives and purposes of this act and of the rules and regulations promulgated. The mining plan and reclamation plan shall include the following:

A statement of the present and proposed use of the land after reclamation;

Plans for surface gradient to a contour suitable for proposed use after reclamation is completed and proposed method of accomplishment;

Type of vegetation and manner of proposed revegetation or other surface treatment of affected area;

Method of disposal of buildings and structures erected during the operation;

One (1) or more maps as may be required by the administrator of reclamation and mining operators on an appropriate scale showing location and extent of the proposed affected lands, together with the location of any public highways, dwelling, surface drainage area, and all utility and other easements existing on the affected lands. The map shall also show the location of all proposed pits, spoil banks, haul roads, railroads, topsoil conservation areas, buildings, refuse or waste areas, shipping areas including conveyors, and shall further set forth the drainage plan on, below, above and away from the affected land including subsurface water above the mineral seam to be removed; and shall further show the location of all waste water impoundments, any settling ponds, and other water treatment facilities, constructed drainways and natural drainways, and the surface bodies of water receiving this discharge. In lieu of an original map, a reproduction of a United States Geological Survey topographic map or aerial photograph is acceptable if the required information is platted. The map of the affected lands shall be accompanied by a typical cross section, showing the elevations of the surface, top and bottom of the mineral seam. Additional cross sections at appropriate intervals may be required by the administrator. The cross sections shall show surface elevations for a distance beyond the outlines of the affected areas as may be determined by the administrator;

An estimate of the total cost of reclaiming the affected lands as outlined in the written proposal computed in accordance with established engineering principles;

A contour map on the same scale as the reclamation map showing to the extent possible the proposed approximate contours of the affected area after completion of proposed reclamation;

The proposed method of separating topsoil, subsoil, and spoil piled, protecting and conserving them from wind and water erosion before reclamation begins by planting a quick growing cover or other acceptable methods, and the proposed method of preserving topsoil free of acid or toxic materials, as well as the manner in which topsoil shall be replaced. If topsoil is virtually nonexistent or is not capable of sustaining vegetation, then the method of removing, segregating and preserving in a like manner subsoil which is better able to support vegetation. Spoil piles are to be kept separate and apart from topsoil. All piles are to be clearly marked so as to avoid confusion. If conditions do not permit the separation, conservation and replacement of topsoil or subsoil, a full explanation of such conditions shall be given and alternate procedures proposed;

A plan for insuring that all acid forming, or toxic materials, or materials constituting a fire, health or safety hazard uncovered during or created by the mining process are promptly treated or disposed of during the mining process in a manner designed to prevent pollution of surface or subsurface water or threats to human or animal health and safety. Such method may include, but not be limited to covering, burying, impounding or otherwise containing or disposing of the acid, toxic, radioactive or otherwise dangerous material;

For a surface mining operation granted a new permit after July 1, 1973, and prior to March 1, 1975, except for an operation legally operating under the 1969 Open Cut Land Reclamation Act, an instrument of consent from the surface landowner, if different from the mineral owner, to the mining plan and reclamation plan. If consent cannot be obtained as to either or both, the applicant may request a hearing before the environmental quality council. The council shall issue an order in lieu of consent if it finds:

That the mining plan and the reclamation plan have been submitted to the surface owner for approval;

That the mining plan and the reclamation plan is detailed so as to illustrate the full proposed surface use including proposed routes of egress and ingress;

That the use does not substantially prohibit the operations of the surface owner;

The proposed plan reclaims the surface to its approved future use, in segments if circumstances permit, as soon as feasibly possible.

For an application filed after March 1, 1975, an instrument of consent from the resident or agricultural landowner, if different from the owner of the mineral estate, granting the applicant permission to enter and commence surface mining operation, and also written approval of the applicant’s mining plan and reclamation plan. As used in this paragraph “resident or agricultural landowner” means a natural person or persons who, or a corporation of which the majority stockholder or stockholders:

Hold legal or equitable title to the land surface directly or through stockholdings, such title having been acquired prior to January 1, 1970, or having been acquired through descent, inheritance or by gift or conveyance from a member of the immediate family of such owner; and

Have their principal place of residence on the land, or personally conduct farming or ranching operations upon a farm or ranch unit to be affected by the surface mining operation, or receive directly a significant portion of their income from such farming or ranching operations.

For any application filed after March 1, 1975, including any lands privately owned but not covered by the provisions of paragraph (b)(xi) of this section an instrument of consent from the surface landowner, if different from the owner of the mineral estate, to the mining plan and reclamation plan. If consent cannot be obtained as to the mining plan or reclamation plan or both, the applicant may request a hearing before the environmental quality council. The council shall issue an order in lieu of consent if it finds:

That the mining plan and the reclamation plan have been submitted to the surface owner for approval;

That the mining plan and the reclamation plan is detailed so as to illustrate the full proposed surface use including proposed routes of egress and ingress;

That the use does not substantially prohibit the operations of the surface owner;

The proposed plan reclaims the surface to its approved future use, in segments if circumstances permit, as soon as feasibly possible;

For surface coal mining operations, that the applicant has the legal authority to extract coal by surface mining methods.

The procedures proposed to avoid constituting a public nuisance, endangering the public safety, human or animal life, property, wildlife and plant life in or adjacent to the permit area including a program of fencing all stockpiles, roadways, pits and refuse or waste areas to protect the surface owner’s ongoing operations;

The methods of diverting surface water around the affected lands where necessary to effectively control pollution or unnecessary erosion;

The methods of reclamation for effective control of erosion, siltation, and pollution of affected stream channels and stream banks by the mining operations;

A statement of the source, quality and quantity of water, if any, to be used in the mining and reclamation operations;

A blasting plan which shall outline the procedures and standards by which the operator of a surface coal mine will meet the provisions of W.S. 35-11-415(b)(xi);

For surface coal mining operations, a plan to minimize the disturbances to the prevailing hydrologic balance at the minesite and in associated offsite areas and to the quality and quantity of water in surface and ground water systems both during and after mining operations and during reclamation. This paragraph does not alter the authority granted under any other section of this act with respect to requirements for maintaining the hydrologic balance in the minesite, or associated offsite areas, of other mining operations;

A projected timetable for accomplishment of the reclamation plan;

For surface coal mining operations, a request for approval of any alternatives which may be proposed to the provisions of the regulations promulgated by the council. For each alternative provision the applicant shall:

Identify the provision in the regulations promulgated by the council for which the alternative is requested;

Describe the alternative proposed and provide an explanation including the submission of data, analysis and information in order to demonstrate that the alternative is in accordance with the applicable provisions of the act and consistent with the regulations promulgated by the council. In addition, the applicant shall demonstrate that the proposed alternative is necessary because of local requirements or local environmental or agricultural conditions;

Paragraph (xx) of this subsection shall not take effect until approved by the secretary of the interior as an amendment to a state program approved pursuant to section 503 of P.L. 95-87.

The applicant may have the local conservation district assist in preparation of, provide data for, perform research, review and comment upon the reclamation. For those lands in a surface coal mining permit application which a reconnaissance inspection suggests may be prime farm lands, a soil survey shall be made or obtained according to standards established by the United States secretary of agriculture in order to confirm the exact location of these prime farm lands, if any. If the United States secretary of agriculture or his representative has determined that the state, area or exact location within the permit area does not contain prime farm lands this subsection is inapplicable.

The applicant shall file a copy of his application for public inspection at the office of the administrator and in the offices of the county clerks of the counties in which the proposed permit area is located. Those parts of the application which contain confidential trade secrets whose disclosure would be harmful to the applicant are exempt from these filings.

The administrator shall notify the applicant within sixty (60) days of submission of the application whether or not it is complete. If the administrator deems the application incomplete, he shall so advise and state in writing to the applicant the information required. All items not specified as incomplete at the end of the first sixty (60) day period shall be deemed complete for the purposes of this subsection.

If the applicant resubmits an application or further information, the administrator shall review the application or additional information within sixty (60) days of each submission and advise the applicant in writing if the application or additional information is complete.

After the application is determined complete, the applicant shall publish a notice of the filing of the application once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed mining site.

The administrator shall review the application and unless the applicant requests a delay advise the applicant in writing within one hundred fifty (150) days from the date of determining the application is complete, that it is suitable for publication under subsection (j) of this section, that the application is deficient or that the application is denied. All reasons for deficiency or denial shall be stated in writing to the applicant. All items not specified as being deficient at the end of the first one hundred fifty (150) day period shall be deemed complete for the purposes of this subsection. After this period, for noncoal permits, the administrator shall not raise any item not previously specified as being deficient unless the applicant in subsequent revisions significantly modifies the application. If the applicant submits additional information in response to any deficiency notice, the administrator shall review such additional information within thirty (30) days of submission and advise the applicant in writing if the application is suitable for publication under subsection (j) of this section, that the application is still deficient or that the application is denied.

The applicant shall cause notice of the application to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed mining site once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks commencing within fifteen (15) days after being notified by the administrator. The notice shall contain information regarding the identity of the applicant, the location of the proposed operation, the proposed dates of commencement and completion of the operation, the proposed future use of the affected land, the location at which information about the application may be obtained, and the location and final date for filing objections to the application. For initial applications or additions of new lands the applicant shall also mail a copy of the notice within five (5) days after first publication to all surface owners of record of the land within the permit area, to surface owners of record of immediately adjacent lands, and to any surface owners within one-half (1/2) mile of the proposed mining site. The applicant shall mail a copy of the application mining plan map within five (5) days after first publication to the Wyoming oil and gas commission. Proof of notice and sworn statement of mailing shall be attached to and become part of the application.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 35, § 2.

The requested permit, other than a surface coal mining permit, shall be granted if the applicant demonstrates that the application complies with the requirements of this act and all applicable federal and state laws. The director shall not deny a permit except for one (1) or more of the following reasons:

The application is incomplete;

The applicant has not properly paid the required fee;

Any part of the proposed operation, reclamation program, or the proposed future use is contrary to the law or policy of this state, or the United States;

The proposed mining operation would irreparably harm, destroy, or materially impair any area that has been designated by the council a rare or uncommon area and having particular historical, archaeological, wildlife, surface geological, botanical or scenic value;

If the proposed mining operation will cause pollution of any waters in violation of the laws of this state or of the federal government;

If the applicant has had any other permit or license issued hereunder revoked, or any bond posted to comply with this act forfeited;

The proposed operation constitutes a public nuisance or endangers the public health and safety;

The affected land lies within three hundred (300) feet of any existing occupied dwelling, home, public building, school, church, community or institutional building, park or cemetery, unless the landowner’s consent has been obtained. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to operations conducted under an approved permit issued by the state land commissioner in compliance with the “Open Cut Land Reclamation Act of 1969”;

The operator is unable to produce the bonds required;

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 35, § 2.

If information in the application or information obtained through the director’s investigation shows that reclamation cannot be accomplished consistent with the purposes and provisions of this act;

through (xiv) Repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 3.

If the applicant has been and continues to be in violation of the provisions of this act;

No permit shall be denied on the basis that the applicant has been in actual violation of the provisions of this act if the violation has been corrected or discontinued.

The applicant for a surface coal mining permit has the burden of establishing that his application is in compliance with this act and all applicable state laws. No surface coal mining permit shall be approved unless the applicant affirmatively demonstrates and the administrator finds in writing:

The application is accurate and complete;

The reclamation plan can accomplish reclamation as required by this act;

The proposed operation has been designed to prevent material damage to the hydrologic balance outside the permit area;

The area proposed to be mined is not included within an area designated unsuitable for surface coal mining pursuant to W.S.

35-11-425

, within an area where mining is prohibited pursuant to section 522(e) of P.L. 95-87, or within an area under review for this designation under an administrative proceeding, unless in such an area as to which an administrative proceeding has commenced pursuant to W.S.

35-11-425

, the operator making the permit application demonstrates that, prior to January 1, 1977, he has made substantial legal and financial commitments in relation to the operation for which he is applying for a permit;

The proposed operation would:

Not interrupt, discontinue, or preclude farming on alluvial valley floors that are irrigated or naturally subirrigated, but, excluding undeveloped range lands which are not significant to farming on said alluvial valley floors and those lands as to which the administrator finds that if the farming that will be interrupted, discontinued or precluded is of such small acreage as to be of negligible impact on the farm’s agricultural production; or

Not materially damage the quantity or quality of water in surface or underground water systems that supply these alluvial valley floors. Paragraph (n)(v) of this section shall not affect those surface coal mining operations which in the year preceding August 3, 1977, produced coal in commercial quantities, and were located within or adjacent to alluvial valley floors or had obtained specific permit approval by the administrator to conduct surface coal mining operations within said alluvial valley floors. If coal deposits are precluded from being mined by this paragraph, the administrator shall certify to the secretary of the interior that the coal owner or lessee may be eligible for participation in a coal exchange program pursuant to section 510(b)(5) of P.L. 95-87.

If the area proposed to be surface coal mined contains prime farmland, the operator has the technological capability to restore such mined area, within a reasonable time, to equivalent or higher levels of yield as nonmined prime farmland in the surrounding area under equivalent levels of management and can meet the soil reconstruction standards of this act and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto;

The schedule provided in paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section indicates that all surface coal mining operations owned or controlled by the applicant are currently in compliance with this act and all laws referred to in paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section or that any violation has been or is in the process of being corrected to the satisfaction of the authority, department or agency which has jurisdiction over the violation.

No permit shall be issued to an applicant after a finding by the director or council, after opportunity for hearing, that the applicant or operator specified in the application controls or has controlled mining operations with a demonstrated pattern of willful violations of such nature and duration with such resulting irreparable harm to the environment as to indicate reckless, knowing or intentional conduct.

The following objection procedure shall apply to applications for mining permits for coal:

Any interested person has the right to file written objections to the application with the director within thirty (30) days after the last publication of the notice required in subsection (j) of this section. The director shall within five (5) business days forward any objection to the applicant and shall make objections available to the public;

If an informal conference is requested by the applicant or objector, the director shall hold the informal conference in the locality of the proposed operation within thirty (30) days after the final date for filing objections under paragraph (i) of this subsection unless a different period is stipulated to by the parties. The director shall publish notice of the time, date and location of the informal conference in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed operation at least two (2) weeks before the date of the informal conference;

The director shall render a decision on the application within thirty (30) days after the deadline to file objections provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection if no informal conference is requested. If the director holds an informal conference, all parties to the conference shall be furnished with a copy of the final written decision of the director issuing or denying the permit within sixty (60) days of the conference. The applicant or objector may appeal the director’s written decision after an informal conference to the council. If a hearing is held, the hearing shall be conducted as a contested case in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and the council shall issue findings of fact and a decision on the application within sixty (60) days after the final hearing;

Notwithstanding W.S.

35-11-1001

, only the applicant or an objector who participated in a hearing before the council may obtain judicial review of the council’s decision.

The following objection procedure shall apply for any other mining permit application:

Any interested person has the right to file written objections to the administrator within thirty (30) days after the last publication of the notice required in subsection (j) of this section. The administrator shall within five (5) business days forward any objection to the applicant and shall make objections available to the public;

The administrator shall review all objections and shall forward a report and recommendations on the objections to the director. The director shall issue to the applicant and to any objector a final written decision issuing or denying the permit within thirty (30) days after the deadline to file objections provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection;

The applicant or objector may appeal the director’s written decision to the council. If a hearing is held, the council shall issue findings of fact and a decision within sixty (60) days after the final hearing;

A person who does not object as provided under this subsection has no right of appeal.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.24; Laws 1974, ch. 14, § 1; 1975, ch. 198, § 2; 1977, ch. 132, § 1; ch. 184, § 1; 1978, ch. 33, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, §§ 2, 3; ch. 65, § 1; ch. 67, § 1; 1983, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 227, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 1993, ch. 40, § 1; ch. 90, § 1; 1995, ch. 64, § 1; 1996, ch. 66, § 1; 2020 ch. 35, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 35, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020, repealed (k), which read “Any interested person has the right to file written objections to the application with the administrator within thirty (30) days after the last publication of the above notice. For surface coal mining operations, the director may hold an informal conference if requested and take action on the application in accordance with the department's rules of practice and procedure, with the right of appeal to the council which shall be heard and tried de novo. A conference shall be held if the director determines that the nature of the complaint or the position of the complainants indicates that an attempt to informally resolve the disputes is preferable to a contested case proceeding. An informal conference or a public hearing shall be held within twenty (20) days after the final date for filing objections unless a different period is stipulated to by the parties. The council or director shall publish notice of the time, date and location of the hearing or conference in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed operation once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks immediately prior to the hearing or conference. The hearing shall be conducted as a contested case in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, and right of judicial review shall be afforded as provided in that act” and (m)(x), which read “If written objections are filed by an interested person under subsection (g) of this section”; rewrote (p), which read “The director shall render a decision on the application within thirty (30) days after completion of the notice period if no informal conference or hearing is requested. If an informal conference is held, all parties to the conference shall be furnished with a copy of the final written decision of the director issuing or denying the permit within sixty (60) days of the conference. If a hearing is held, the council shall issue findings of fact and a decision on the application within sixty (60) days after the final hearing. The director shall issue or deny the permit no later than fifteen (15) days from receipt of any findings of fact and decision of the environmental quality council”; and added (q).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (m)(x) substituted “subsection (k)” for “subsection (g).”

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "two hundred dollars ($200.00)" for "one hundred dollars ($100.00)" in the first sentence of (a)(xii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Open Cut Land Reclamation Act. —

The Open Cut Land Reclamation Act of 1969, referred to in the first sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b)(x) and in the second sentence in subsection (m)(viii), was repealed by Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Application to pre-existing operations. —

The reclamation requirements of this chapter apply to preexisting operations which were not completed or substantially completed prior to this chapter's enactment. Universal Equip. Co. v. State, 839 P.2d 967,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1992).

Long-term lessee of land or holder of right-of-way easement is not “surface landowner”

or “surface owner” entitled to the protection of the statutory provisions requiring consent of a “surface landowner” and the posting of a bond to protect the “surface owner or owners.” Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. State, 766 P.2d 537,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. Jan. 9, 1989).

Following condemnation, servient estate owner not surface owner for purposes of required consent. —

Condemnation of a way of necessity for a railroad spur track and a mine truck haul road, according to statute, dispenses with the statutory requirement that a resident or agricultural landowner or a surface landowner consent to mining operations, or an order in lieu of such consent in the case of the latter kind of ownership, be included in an application for a mining permit, since after condemnation of such an easement the owner of the servient estate is not a surface owner for purposes of this section. WYMO Fuels v. Edwards, 723 P.2d 1230,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 601

(Wyo. 1986).

Notice adequate absent prejudice. —

Where the objectors' actions indicated they recognized and understood they were protesting against any alteration in the direction and sequence of the mine plan progression, the notice served to inform adjoining property owners that a significant revision to a mining permit was under consideration and they were not prejudiced by the omission of the information from the notice. Pfeil v. Amax Coal W., 908 P.2d 956,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 1995).

Prior special-area designation is not required before council consideration of individual permit application

can be made, which may result in denial premised on the site-sensitive statutory criteria. LeFaivre v. Environmental Quality Council, 735 P.2d 428,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 421

(Wyo. 1987).

Special nature of mine site justifies denial. —

The special nature of a mine site in Sweetwater county known as the “Natural Corrals” justified approval of the council's decision that reclamation would be impossible if the special nature of the area were destroyed by cutting up and hauling away the area's special features, namely the rock formation. LeFaivre v. Environmental Quality Council, 735 P.2d 428,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 421

(Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

Grams v. Environmental Quality Council, 730 P.2d 784,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 649

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Rissler & McMurry Co. v. State, 917 P.2d 1157,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Platte Dev. Co. v. State, Envtl. Quality Council, 966 P.2d 972,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1998).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Federal Mineral Reservations,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1975).

See article, “The Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977: An Overview of Reclamation Requirements and Implementation,” XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 703 (1978).

For case note, “Mining Law — Are Surface Lessees ‘Surface Owners’ Entitled to Protection of Consent and Bonding Provisions of Wyoming's Environmental Quality Act? Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. State, 766 P.2d 537,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 447 (1990).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 175.14, 200.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-407.
Water impoundments.

In any plan for the creation of a permanent water impoundment the applicant must adequately demonstrate that:

The size of the impoundment, contouring and revegetation, if any, are suitable for its intended purpose and use;

Final grading will provide adequate safety and access for proposed water users;

The impoundment dam construction will be so designed to insure permanent stability and to prevent safety hazards.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 198, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.24:1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Severability. —

Section 4, ch. 198, Laws 1975, reads: “If any portion of this act is declared invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, such decision shall be limited to the portions found invalid, and shall not affect or invalidate the remaining portions of this act, which shall remain in full force and effect.”

§ 35-11-408.
Permit transfer.

A permit holder desiring to transfer his permit shall apply to the administrator. The potential transferee shall file with the administrator a statement of qualifications to hold a permit as though he were the original applicant for the permit and shall further agree to be bound by all of the terms and conditions of the original permit. The administrator shall recommend approval or denial of the transfer to the director. No transfer of a permit will be allowed if the current permit holder is in violation of this act, unless the transferee agrees to bring the permit into compliance with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.25; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-409.
Permit revocation.

The director shall revoke a mining permit if at any time he determines that the permit holder intentionally misstated or failed to provide any fact that would have resulted in the denial of a mining permit and which good faith compliance with the policies, purposes, and provisions of this act would have required him to provide.

Unless an emergency exists, and except as otherwise provided in this act, the revocation of a permit shall become effective upon thirty (30) days’ notice to the operator. In an emergency, a special meeting of the council may cause a revocation to become effective upon receipt of notice by the permit holder.

When an inspection carried out pursuant to the enforcement of this act reveals that a pattern of violations by any surface coal mine operator of any requirements of this act or any permit conditions required by this act has existed, and that these violations were caused by the unwarranted failure of the operator to comply with these requirements or permit conditions, or that these violations are willfully caused by the operator, the director shall issue an order to the operator to show cause why the permit should not be suspended or revoked. Opportunity for a public hearing before the council shall be provided. If a hearing is requested the director shall inform all interested parties of the time and place of the hearing. Upon failure of the operator to show cause why the permit should not be suspended or revoked, the council shall suspend or revoke the permit.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.26; Laws 1978, ch. 33, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).